Connecticut, session 2026, HB05356.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 17b-276 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall identify geographic
areas of the state where competitive bidding for nonemergency
transportation services provided to medical assistance recipients to
access covered medical services would result in cost savings to the state.
For the identified areas, the Commissioner of Social Services, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Transportation, the
Commissioner of Public Health and the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, shall purchase such nonemergency transportation
services through a competitive bidding process. Any transportation
providers awarded a contract or subcontract for the direct provision of
such services shall meet state licensure or certification requirements and
sHB5356 / File No. 414 1

sHB5356 File No. 414
the nonemergency transportation requirements established by the
Department of Social Services, and shall provide the most cost effective
transportation service, provided (1) any contractor awarded a contract
solely for coordinating such transportation services shall not be required
to meet such licensure or certification requirements, [and provided] (2)
the first such contracts for the purchase of such services shall not exceed
one year, and (3) any driver providing services under such contract or
subcontract who is operating under the provisions of subdivision (3) of
subsection (e) of section 14-44, shall be deemed to have met the
requirements prescribed in this subsection for a period not to exceed
ninety days in the aggregate. Prior to awarding a contract pursuant to
this section, the Commissioner of Social Services shall consider the effect
of the contract on the emergency ambulance primary service areas and
volunteer ambulance services affected by the contract. The
commissioner may limit the geographic areas to be served by a
contractor and may limit the amount of services to be performed by a
contractor. The commissioner may operate one or more pilot programs
prior to state-wide operation of a competitive bidding program for
nonemergency transportation services. By enrolling in the Medicaid
program or participating in the competitively bid contract for
nonemergency transportation services, providers of nonemergency
transportation services agree to offer to recipients of medical assistance
all types or levels of transportation services for which they are licensed
or certified. Effective October 1, 1991, payment for such services shall be
made only for services provided to an eligible recipient who is actually
transported. A contract entered into pursuant to this section may
include services provided by another state agency. Notwithstanding
any provision of the general statutes, a contract entered into pursuant
to this section shall establish the rates to be paid for the transportation
services provided under the contract. The Commissioner of Social
Services shall, at least annually, (A) review such rates, (B) ensure such
rates are adequate to provide a pool of nonemergency medical
transportation drivers to provide Medicaid recipients access to such
transportation services, and (C) ensure such rates are included in each
contract. A contract entered into pursuant to this section may include
sHB5356 / File No. 414 2

sHB5356 File No. 414
services provided by another state agency and shall supersede any
conflicting provisions of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies
pertaining to medical transportation services. Any contractor awarded
a contract for coordinating nonemergency transportation services for
medical assistance recipients, who also coordinates transportation
services for nonmedical assistance recipients, shall disclose to any
transportation provider, with whom it subcontracts to provide
nonemergency transportation services under this section, the source of
payment at the time the service is requested.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-276(a)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed and the provisions of Subsec. (a)(3) were rewritten
for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5356 / File No. 414 3

sHB5356 File No. 414
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes certain drivers eligible to provide nonemergency
medical transportation (NEMT) through a contract or subcontract with
the Department of Social Services (DSS). To the extent that an increased
number of drivers allowed under the bill (taxicab and livery) provide
NEMT services at a higher rate than current providers, the state could
experience a cost.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sHB5356 / File No. 414 4

sHB5356 File No. 414
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5356
AN ACT CONCERNING NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL
TRANSPORTATION FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS.